New York, session 2025-2026, A8147.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, 2 any person who is licensed or certified as a physician, physician's 3 assistant, massage therapist, physical therapist, chiropractor, dentist, 4 optometrist, nurse, nurse practitioner, emergency medical technician, 5 podiatrist or athletic trainer by a foreign government may provide 6 professional services within this state without first being licensed 7 pursuant to the provisions of title 8 of the education law or certified 8 pursuant to the provisions in the public health law, as may be applica- 9 ble, to the team athletes, coaches, staff and delegations originating 10 from such foreign government, in connection with the 2025 Ryder Cup. 11 Such services shall be limited to athletes and personnel in relation to 12 the 2025 Ryder Cup, between the dates of September 22, 2025, and Septem- 13 ber 29, 2025. 14 § 2. Any person who is licensed or certified to practice as a physi- 15 cian, physician's assistant, massage therapist, physical therapist, 16 chiropractor, dentist, optometrist, nurse, nurse practitioner, emergency 17 medical technician, podiatrist or athletic trainer in another state or 18 territory, who is in good standing in such state or territory, and who 19 has been appointed by the PGA of America to provide professional 20 services at an event in this state sanctioned by the PGA of America, may 21 provide such professional services to team athletes, coaches, staff and 22 delegations from such state or territory registered to train at a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11772-01-5 A. 8147 2 1 location in this state or registered to compete in an event conducted 2 under the sanction of the PGA of America in this state without first 3 being licensed pursuant to the provisions of title 8 of the education 4 law or certified pursuant to the provisions of the public health law, as 5 may be applicable. Such services shall be limited to team athletes, 6 coaches, staff and delegations in relation to the 2025 Ryder Cup, 7 between the dates of September 22, 2025, and September 29, 2025. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect September 22, 2025, and shall expire 9 and be deemed repealed September 29, 2025.